Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB606.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of amending the Constitution of Kentucky to
establish that citizens of this state can propose changes to the law through ballot
initiatives, provided the changes presented do not target a particular class of individuals,
as stated below?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 29 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative power shall be vested in a House of Representatives and a
Senate, which, together, shall be styled the "General Assembly of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky[.]"; but the people reserve to themselves the initiative power to propose laws
and to enact or reject the same at the polls independent of the General Assembly.
(2) The initiative power of the people may be invoked by petition that contains
the proposed measure set forth at length and signatures and residential addresses of at
least three percent of the total number of votes cast in the Commonwealth for the office
of Governor in the most recent gubernatorial election. Initiative petitions shall contain
only one subject and cannot target a particular class of individuals.
(3) The initiative petition shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The
Secretary of State shall certify that the petition meets the signature requirements, that
the signatures are valid, and that the petition complies with all other provisions of this
section and applicable law. Once the petition is certified, the Secretary of State shall
submit the measure to the voters of the State at the next regular election.
(4) Any measure submitted by initiative to the voters shall become law when
approved by a majority of the voters at the regular election.
(5) If conflicting measures are approved by a majority of the votes severally cast
for and against the measures at the same election, the measure receiving the highest
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2026 12:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 226
number of affirmative votes shall become law.
(6) The veto power of the Governor shall not extend to measures enacted by the
people under this section.
(7) The General Assembly may provide by general law procedures to facilitate
and safeguard the initiative power of the people, but not to hamper, restrict, or impair
this power.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation
published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the
same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their
acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August
preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the
United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September
preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2026 12:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 226
Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky
contained in Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk
shall have the entirety of the question and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on
the ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting
machines in use in each county or precinct.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2026 12:08 PM Jacketed